Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.080

Surplus school property, rental, lease, or use of—Community use not impaired.

Nothing in RCW 28A.335.040 through 28A.335.070 shall preclude school district boards of directors from making available school property for community use in accordance with the provisions of RCW 28A.335.150, 28A.320.510, or 28A.335.250, and school district administrative policy governing such use.

[ 1990 c 33 s 357; 1980 c 115 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.58.037.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 115: See note following RCW 28A.335.090.